Illinois, session 104th, SB2195.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Sections 21 and 22.34 and by adding Section 3.309 as 6follows: 7    (415 ILCS 5/3.309 new)8    Sec. 3.309. Organic waste. "Organic waste" means food 9scrap, uncontaminated wood waste, livestock waste, crop 10residue, paper waste, or other non-hazardous carbonaceous 11waste, other than landscape waste, that is collected and 12processed separately from the rest of the municipal waste 13stream. 14    (415 ILCS 5/21)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1021)15    Sec. 21. Prohibited acts. No person shall:16    (a) Cause or allow the open dumping of any waste.17    (b) Abandon, dump, or deposit any waste upon the public 18highways or other public property, except in a sanitary 19landfill approved by the Agency pursuant to regulations 20adopted by the Board.21    (c) Abandon any vehicle in violation of the "Abandoned 22Vehicles Amendment to the Illinois Vehicle Code", as enacted   SB2195- 2 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1by the 76th General Assembly.2    (d) Conduct any waste-storage, waste-treatment, or 3waste-disposal operation:4        (1) without a permit granted by the Agency or in 5    violation of any conditions imposed by such permit, 6    including periodic reports and full access to adequate 7    records and the inspection of facilities, as may be 8    necessary to assure compliance with this Act and with 9    regulations and standards adopted thereunder; provided, 10    however, that, except for municipal solid waste landfill 11    units that receive waste on or after October 9, 1993, and 12    CCR surface impoundments, no permit shall be required for 13    (i) any person conducting a waste-storage, 14    waste-treatment, or waste-disposal operation for wastes 15    generated by such person's own activities which are 16    stored, treated, or disposed within the site where such 17    wastes are generated, (ii) until one year after the 18    effective date of rules adopted by the Board under 19    subsection (n) of Section 22.38, a facility located in a 20    county with a population over 700,000 as of January 1, 21    2000, operated and located in accordance with Section 22    22.38 of this Act, and used exclusively for the transfer, 23    storage, or treatment of general construction or 24    demolition debris, provided that the facility was 25    receiving construction or demolition debris on August 24, 26    2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-611), or (iii)   SB2195- 3 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1    any person conducting a waste transfer, storage, 2    treatment, or disposal operation, including, but not 3    limited to, a waste transfer or waste composting 4    operation, under a mass animal mortality event plan 5    created by the Department of Agriculture;6        (2) in violation of any regulations or standards 7    adopted by the Board under this Act;8        (3) which receives waste after August 31, 1988, does 9    not have a permit issued by the Agency, and is (i) a 10    landfill used exclusively for the disposal of waste 11    generated at the site, (ii) a surface impoundment 12    receiving special waste not listed in an NPDES permit, 13    (iii) a waste pile in which the total volume of waste is 14    greater than 100 cubic yards or the waste is stored for 15    over one year, or (iv) a land treatment facility receiving 16    special waste generated at the site; without giving notice 17    of the operation to the Agency by January 1, 1989, or 30 18    days after the date on which the operation commences, 19    whichever is later, and every 3 years thereafter. The form 20    for such notification shall be specified by the Agency, 21    and shall be limited to information regarding: the name 22    and address of the location of the operation; the type of 23    operation; the types and amounts of waste stored, treated 24    or disposed of on an annual basis; the remaining capacity 25    of the operation; and the remaining expected life of the 26    operation.  SB2195- 4 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1    Item (3) of this subsection (d) shall not apply to any 2person engaged in agricultural activity who is disposing of a 3substance that constitutes solid waste, if the substance was 4acquired for use by that person on his own property, and the 5substance is disposed of on his own property in accordance 6with regulations or standards adopted by the Board.7    This subsection (d) shall not apply to hazardous waste.8    (e) Dispose, treat, store or abandon any waste, or 9transport any waste into this State for disposal, treatment, 10storage or abandonment, except at a site or facility which 11meets the requirements of this Act and of regulations and 12standards thereunder.13    (f) Conduct any hazardous waste-storage, hazardous 14waste-treatment or hazardous waste-disposal operation:15        (1) without a RCRA permit for the site issued by the 16    Agency under subsection (d) of Section 39 of this Act, or 17    in violation of any condition imposed by such permit, 18    including periodic reports and full access to adequate 19    records and the inspection of facilities, as may be 20    necessary to assure compliance with this Act and with 21    regulations and standards adopted thereunder; or22        (2) in violation of any regulations or standards 23    adopted by the Board under this Act; or24        (3) in violation of any RCRA permit filing requirement 25    established under standards adopted by the Board under 26    this Act; or  SB2195- 5 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1        (4) in violation of any order adopted by the Board 2    under this Act.3    Notwithstanding the above, no RCRA permit shall be 4required under this subsection or subsection (d) of Section 39 5of this Act for any person engaged in agricultural activity 6who is disposing of a substance which has been identified as a 7hazardous waste, and which has been designated by Board 8regulations as being subject to this exception, if the 9substance was acquired for use by that person on his own 10property and the substance is disposed of on his own property 11in accordance with regulations or standards adopted by the 12Board.13    (g) Conduct any hazardous waste-transportation operation:14        (1) without registering with and obtaining a special 15    waste hauling permit from the Agency in accordance with 16    the regulations adopted by the Board under this Act; or17        (2) in violation of any regulations or standards 18    adopted by the Board under this Act.19    (h) Conduct any hazardous waste-recycling or hazardous 20waste-reclamation or hazardous waste-reuse operation in 21violation of any regulations, standards or permit requirements 22adopted by the Board under this Act.23    (i) Conduct any process or engage in any act which 24produces hazardous waste in violation of any regulations or 25standards adopted by the Board under subsections (a) and (c) 26of Section 22.4 of this Act.  SB2195- 6 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1    (j) Conduct any special waste-transportation operation in 2violation of any regulations, standards or permit requirements 3adopted by the Board under this Act. However, sludge from a 4water or sewage treatment plant owned and operated by a unit of 5local government which (1) is subject to a sludge management 6plan approved by the Agency or a permit granted by the Agency, 7and (2) has been tested and determined not to be a hazardous 8waste as required by applicable State and federal laws and 9regulations, may be transported in this State without a 10special waste hauling permit, and the preparation and carrying 11of a manifest shall not be required for such sludge under the 12rules of the Pollution Control Board. The unit of local 13government which operates the treatment plant producing such 14sludge shall file an annual report with the Agency identifying 15the volume of such sludge transported during the reporting 16period, the hauler of the sludge, and the disposal sites to 17which it was transported. This subsection (j) shall not apply 18to hazardous waste.19    (k) Fail or refuse to pay any fee imposed under this Act.20    (l) Locate a hazardous waste disposal site above an active 21or inactive shaft or tunneled mine or within 2 miles of an 22active fault in the earth's crust. In counties of population 23less than 225,000 no hazardous waste disposal site shall be 24located (1) within 1 1/2 miles of the corporate limits as 25defined on June 30, 1978, of any municipality without the 26approval of the governing body of the municipality in an   SB2195- 7 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1official action; or (2) within 1000 feet of an existing 2private well or the existing source of a public water supply 3measured from the boundary of the actual active permitted site 4and excluding existing private wells on the property of the 5permit applicant. The provisions of this subsection do not 6apply to publicly owned sewage works or the disposal or 7utilization of sludge from publicly owned sewage works.8    (m) Transfer interest in any land which has been used as a 9hazardous waste disposal site without written notification to 10the Agency of the transfer and to the transferee of the 11conditions imposed by the Agency upon its use under subsection 12(g) of Section 39.13    (n) Use any land which has been used as a hazardous waste 14disposal site except in compliance with conditions imposed by 15the Agency under subsection (g) of Section 39.16    (o) Conduct a sanitary landfill operation which is 17required to have a permit under subsection (d) of this 18Section, in a manner which results in any of the following 19conditions:20        (1) refuse in standing or flowing waters;21        (2) leachate flows entering waters of the State;22        (3) leachate flows exiting the landfill confines (as 23    determined by the boundaries established for the landfill 24    by a permit issued by the Agency);25        (4) open burning of refuse in violation of Section 9 26    of this Act;  SB2195- 8 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1        (5) uncovered refuse remaining from any previous 2    operating day or at the conclusion of any operating day, 3    unless authorized by permit;4        (6) failure to provide final cover within time limits 5    established by Board regulations;6        (7) acceptance of wastes without necessary permits;7        (8) scavenging as defined by Board regulations;8        (9) deposition of refuse in any unpermitted portion of 9    the landfill;10        (10) acceptance of a special waste without a required 11    manifest;12        (11) failure to submit reports required by permits or 13    Board regulations;14        (12) failure to collect and contain litter from the 15    site by the end of each operating day;16        (13) failure to submit any cost estimate for the site 17    or any performance bond or other security for the site as 18    required by this Act or Board rules.19    The prohibitions specified in this subsection (o) shall be 20enforceable by the Agency either by administrative citation 21under Section 31.1 of this Act or as otherwise provided by this 22Act. The specific prohibitions in this subsection do not limit 23the power of the Board to establish regulations or standards 24applicable to sanitary landfills.25    (p) In violation of subdivision (a) of this Section, cause 26or allow the open dumping of any waste in a manner which   SB2195- 9 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1results in any of the following occurrences at the dump site:2        (1) litter;3        (2) scavenging;4        (3) open burning;5        (4) deposition of waste in standing or flowing waters;6        (5) proliferation of disease vectors;7        (6) standing or flowing liquid discharge from the dump 8    site;9        (7) deposition of:10            (i) general construction or demolition debris as 11        defined in Section 3.160(a) of this Act; or12            (ii) clean construction or demolition debris as 13        defined in Section 3.160(b) of this Act.14    The prohibitions specified in this subsection (p) shall be 15enforceable by the Agency either by administrative citation 16under Section 31.1 of this Act or as otherwise provided by this 17Act. The specific prohibitions in this subsection do not limit 18the power of the Board to establish regulations or standards 19applicable to open dumping.20    (q) Conduct a landscape waste composting operation without 21an Agency permit, provided, however, that no permit shall be 22required for any person:23        (1) conducting a landscape waste composting operation 24    for landscape wastes generated by such person's own 25    activities which are stored, treated, or disposed of 26    within the site where such wastes are generated; or  SB2195- 10 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1        (1.5) conducting a landscape waste composting 2    operation that (i) has no more than 25 cubic yards of 3    landscape waste, composting additives, composting 4    material, or end-product compost on-site at any one time 5    and (ii) is not engaging in commercial activity; or 6        (2) applying landscape waste or composted landscape 7    waste at agronomic rates; or8        (2.5) operating a landscape waste composting facility 9    at a site having 10 or more occupied non-farm residences 10    within 1/2 mile of its boundaries, if the facility meets 11    all of the following criteria: 12            (A) the composting facility is operated by the 13        farmer on property on which the composting material is 14        utilized, and the composting facility constitutes no 15        more than 2% of the site's total acreage;16            (A-5) any composting additives that the composting 17        facility accepts and uses at the facility are 18        necessary to provide proper conditions for composting 19        and do not exceed 10% of the total composting material 20        at the facility at any one time; 21            (B) the property on which the composting facility 22        is located, and any associated property on which the 23        compost is used, is principally and diligently devoted 24        to the production of agricultural crops and is not 25        owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by any waste 26        hauler or generator of nonagricultural compost   SB2195- 11 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1        materials, and the operator of the composting facility 2        is not an employee, partner, shareholder, or in any 3        way connected with or controlled by any such waste 4        hauler or generator; 5            (C) all compost generated by the composting 6        facility, except incidental sales of finished compost, 7        is applied at agronomic rates and used as mulch, 8        fertilizer, or soil conditioner on land actually 9        farmed by the person operating the composting 10        facility, and the finished compost is not stored at 11        the composting site for a period longer than 18 months 12        prior to its application as mulch, fertilizer, or soil 13        conditioner; 14            (D) no fee is charged for the acceptance of 15        materials to be composted at the facility; and 16            (E) the owner or operator, by January 1, 2014 (or 17        the January 1 following commencement of operation, 18        whichever is later) and January 1 of each year 19        thereafter, registers the site with the Agency, (ii) 20        reports to the Agency on the volume of composting 21        material received and used at the site; (iii) 22        certifies to the Agency that the site complies with 23        the requirements set forth in subparagraphs (A), 24        (A-5), (B), (C), and (D) of this paragraph (2.5); and 25        (iv) certifies to the Agency that all composting 26        material was placed more than 200 feet from the   SB2195- 12 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1        nearest potable water supply well, was placed outside 2        the boundary of the 10-year floodplain or on a part of 3        the site that is floodproofed, was placed at least 1/4 4        mile from the nearest residence (other than a 5        residence located on the same property as the 6        facility) or a lesser distance from the nearest 7        residence (other than a residence located on the same 8        property as the facility) if the municipality in which 9        the facility is located has by ordinance approved a 10        lesser distance than 1/4 mile, and was placed more 11        than 5 feet above the water table; any ordinance 12        approving a residential setback of less than 1/4 mile 13        that is used to meet the requirements of this 14        subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2.5) of this subsection 15        must specifically reference this paragraph; or 16        (3) operating a landscape waste composting facility on 17    a farm, if the facility meets all of the following 18    criteria:19            (A) the composting facility is operated by the 20        farmer on property on which the composting material is 21        utilized, and the composting facility constitutes no 22        more than 2% of the property's total acreage, except 23        that the Board may allow a higher percentage for 24        individual sites where the owner or operator has 25        demonstrated to the Board that the site's soil 26        characteristics or crop needs require a higher rate;  SB2195- 13 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1            (A-1) the composting facility accepts from other 2        agricultural operations for composting with landscape 3        waste no materials other than uncontaminated and 4        source-separated (i) crop residue and other 5        agricultural plant residue generated from the 6        production and harvesting of crops and other customary 7        farm practices, including, but not limited to, stalks, 8        leaves, seed pods, husks, bagasse, and roots and (ii) 9        plant-derived animal bedding, such as straw or 10        sawdust, that is free of manure and was not made from 11        painted or treated wood; 12            (A-2) any composting additives that the composting 13        facility accepts and uses at the facility are 14        necessary to provide proper conditions for composting 15        and do not exceed 10% of the total composting material 16        at the facility at any one time; 17            (B) the property on which the composting facility 18        is located, and any associated property on which the 19        compost is used, is principally and diligently devoted 20        to the production of agricultural crops and is not 21        owned, leased or otherwise controlled by any waste 22        hauler or generator of nonagricultural compost 23        materials, and the operator of the composting facility 24        is not an employee, partner, shareholder, or in any 25        way connected with or controlled by any such waste 26        hauler or generator;  SB2195- 14 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1            (C) all compost generated by the composting 2        facility, except incidental sales of finished compost, 3        is applied at agronomic rates and used as mulch, 4        fertilizer or soil conditioner on land actually farmed 5        by the person operating the composting facility, and 6        the finished compost is not stored at the composting 7        site for a period longer than 18 months prior to its 8        application as mulch, fertilizer, or soil conditioner;9            (D) the owner or operator, by January 1 of each 10        year, (i) registers the site with the Agency, (ii) 11        reports to the Agency on the volume of composting 12        material received and used at the site and the volume 13        of material comprising the incidental sale of finished 14        compost under this subsection (q), (iii) certifies to 15        the Agency that the site complies with the 16        requirements set forth in subparagraphs (A), (A-1), 17        (A-2), (B), and (C) of this paragraph (q)(3), and (iv) 18        certifies to the Agency that all composting material: 19                (I) was placed more than 200 feet from the 20            nearest potable water supply well;21                (II) was placed outside the boundary of the 22            10-year floodplain or on a part of the site that is 23            floodproofed;24                (III) was placed either (aa) at least 1/4 mile 25            from the nearest residence (other than a residence 26            located on the same property as the facility) and   SB2195- 15 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1            there are not more than 10 occupied non-farm 2            residences within 1/2 mile of the boundaries of 3            the site on the date of application or (bb) a 4            lesser distance from the nearest residence (other 5            than a residence located on the same property as 6            the facility) provided that the municipality or 7            county in which the facility is located has by 8            ordinance approved a lesser distance than 1/4 mile 9            and there are not more than 10 occupied non-farm 10            residences within 1/2 mile of the boundaries of 11            the site on the date of application; and12                (IV) was placed more than 5 feet above the 13            water table. 14            Any ordinance approving a residential setback of 15        less than 1/4 mile that is used to meet the 16        requirements of this subparagraph (D) must 17        specifically reference this subparagraph.18    For the purposes of this subsection (q), "agronomic rates" 19means the application of not more than 20 tons per acre per 20year, except that the Board may allow a higher rate for 21individual sites where the owner or operator has demonstrated 22to the Board that the site's soil characteristics or crop 23needs require a higher rate.24    For the purposes of this subsection (q), "incidental sale 25of finished compost" means the sale of finished compost that 26meets general use compost standards and is no more than 20% or   SB2195- 16 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1300 cubic yards, whichever is less, of the total compost 2created annually by a private landowner for the landowner's 3own use. 4    (r) Cause or allow the storage or disposal of coal 5combustion waste unless:6        (1) such waste is stored or disposed of at a site or 7    facility for which a permit has been obtained or is not 8    otherwise required under subsection (d) of this Section; 9    or10        (2) such waste is stored or disposed of as a part of 11    the design and reclamation of a site or facility which is 12    an abandoned mine site in accordance with the Abandoned 13    Mined Lands and Water Reclamation Act; or14        (3) such waste is stored or disposed of at a site or 15    facility which is operating under NPDES and Subtitle D 16    permits issued by the Agency pursuant to regulations 17    adopted by the Board for mine-related water pollution and 18    permits issued pursuant to the federal Surface Mining 19    Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-87) or the 20    rules and regulations thereunder or any law or rule or 21    regulation adopted by the State of Illinois pursuant 22    thereto, and the owner or operator of the facility agrees 23    to accept the waste; and either:24            (i) such waste is stored or disposed of in 25        accordance with requirements applicable to refuse 26        disposal under regulations adopted by the Board for   SB2195- 17 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1        mine-related water pollution and pursuant to NPDES and 2        Subtitle D permits issued by the Agency under such 3        regulations; or4            (ii) the owner or operator of the facility 5        demonstrates all of the following to the Agency, and 6        the facility is operated in accordance with the 7        demonstration as approved by the Agency: (1) the 8        disposal area will be covered in a manner that will 9        support continuous vegetation, (2) the facility will 10        be adequately protected from wind and water erosion, 11        (3) the pH will be maintained so as to prevent 12        excessive leaching of metal ions, and (4) adequate 13        containment or other measures will be provided to 14        protect surface water and groundwater from 15        contamination at levels prohibited by this Act, the 16        Illinois Groundwater Protection Act, or regulations 17        adopted pursuant thereto.18    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Title, the 19disposal of coal combustion waste pursuant to item (2) or (3) 20of this subdivision (r) shall be exempt from the other 21provisions of this Title V, and notwithstanding the provisions 22of Title X of this Act, the Agency is authorized to grant 23experimental permits which include provision for the disposal 24of wastes from the combustion of coal and other materials 25pursuant to items (2) and (3) of this subdivision (r).26    (s) After April 1, 1989, offer for transportation,   SB2195- 18 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1transport, deliver, receive or accept special waste for which 2a manifest is required, unless the manifest indicates that the 3fee required under Section 22.8 of this Act has been paid.4    (t) Cause or allow a lateral expansion of a municipal 5solid waste landfill unit on or after October 9, 1993, without 6a permit modification, granted by the Agency, that authorizes 7the lateral expansion.8    (u) Conduct any vegetable by-product treatment, storage, 9disposal or transportation operation in violation of any 10regulation, standards or permit requirements adopted by the 11Board under this Act. However, no permit shall be required 12under this Title V for the land application of vegetable 13by-products conducted pursuant to Agency permit issued under 14Title III of this Act to the generator of the vegetable 15by-products. In addition, vegetable by-products may be 16transported in this State without a special waste hauling 17permit, and without the preparation and carrying of a 18manifest.19    (v) (Blank).20    (w) Conduct any generation, transportation, or recycling 21of construction or demolition debris, clean or general, or 22uncontaminated soil generated during construction, remodeling, 23repair, and demolition of utilities, structures, and roads 24that is not commingled with any waste, without the maintenance 25of documentation identifying the hauler, generator, place of 26origin of the debris or soil, the weight or volume of the   SB2195- 19 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1debris or soil, and the location, owner, and operator of the 2facility where the debris or soil was transferred, disposed, 3recycled, or treated. This documentation must be maintained by 4the generator, transporter, or recycler for 3 years. This 5subsection (w) shall not apply to (1) a permitted pollution 6control facility that transfers or accepts construction or 7demolition debris, clean or general, or uncontaminated soil 8for final disposal, recycling, or treatment, (2) a public 9utility (as that term is defined in the Public Utilities Act) 10or a municipal utility, (3) the Illinois Department of 11Transportation, or (4) a municipality or a county highway 12department, with the exception of any municipality or county 13highway department located within a county having a population 14of over 3,000,000 inhabitants or located in a county that is 15contiguous to a county having a population of over 3,000,000 16inhabitants; but it shall apply to an entity that contracts 17with a public utility, a municipal utility, the Illinois 18Department of Transportation, or a municipality or a county 19highway department. The terms "generation" and "recycling", as 20used in this subsection, do not apply to clean construction or 21demolition debris when (i) used as fill material below grade 22outside of a setback zone if covered by sufficient 23uncontaminated soil to support vegetation within 30 days of 24the completion of filling or if covered by a road or structure, 25(ii) solely broken concrete without protruding metal bars is 26used for erosion control, or (iii) milled asphalt or crushed   SB2195- 20 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1concrete is used as aggregate in construction of the shoulder 2of a roadway. The terms "generation" and "recycling", as used 3in this subsection, do not apply to uncontaminated soil that 4is not commingled with any waste when (i) used as fill material 5below grade or contoured to grade, or (ii) used at the site of 6generation.7    (y) Inject any carbon dioxide stream produced by a carbon 8dioxide capture project into a Class II well, as defined by the 9Board under this Act, or a Class VI well converted from a Class 10II well, for purposes of enhanced oil or gas recovery, 11including, but not limited to, the facilitation of enhanced 12oil or gas recovery from another well.13    (z) Sell or transport concentrated carbon dioxide stream 14produced by a carbon dioxide capture project for use in 15enhanced oil or gas recovery.16    (aa) Operate a carbon sequestration activity in a manner 17that causes, threatens, or allows the release of carbon 18dioxide so as to tend to cause water pollution in this State. 19    (bb) Conduct an organic waste composting operation, other 20than a landscape waste composting operation, without an Agency 21permit; provided, however, that no permit shall be required 22for any person:23        (1) conducting an organic waste composting operation 24    that (i) has no more than 25 cubic yards of 25    source-separated organic waste, composting additives, 26    composting material, or end-product compost on-site at any   SB2195- 21 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1    one time and (ii) is not engaging in commercial activity; 2    or3        (2) conducting an organic waste composting operation 4    that meets all of the following requirements:5            (A) There is no more than 1,000 cubic yards of 6        organic waste, composting additives, composting 7        material, or end-product compost on-site at any one 8        time.9            (B) The portion of the site or facility used for 10        the composting operation is set back at least 200 feet 11        from the nearest potable water supply well.12            (C) The portion of the site or facility used for 13        the composting operation is located outside the 14        boundary of the 10-year floodplain or must be 15        floodproofed.16            (D) By the end of each operating day, all organic 17        waste is processed and (i) placed into an enclosed 18        vessel in which air flow and temperature are 19        controlled or (ii) placed into windrows or other piles 20        and covered in a manner that prevents scavenging by 21        birds and animals and prevents other nuisances.22            (E) Organic waste is not placed within 5 feet of 23        the water table.24            (F) Runoff from the portion of the site or 25        facility used for the composting operation is 26        controlled to prevent offsite runoff.  SB2195- 22 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1            (G) Dust, odors, and noise from the composting 2        operation are prevented from migrating off-site.3            (H) No later than March 1 of each year the 4        composting operation is registered with the Agency on 5        Agency prescribed forms which shall include, but not 6        be limited to, information regarding the owner and 7        operator of the composting operation, the owner of 8        property on which the composting operation is located, 9        a contact person for the composting operation, a 10        description of the composting operation, the volume of 11        organic waste received during the previous calendar 12        year, the volume of compost produced during the 13        previous calendar year, and a certification that the 14        composting operation meets the requirements of this 15        paragraph (2). 16(Source: P.A. 102-216, eff. 1-1-22; 102-310, eff. 8-6-21; 17102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-342, eff. 181-1-24; 103-651, eff. 7-18-24.) 19    (415 ILCS 5/22.34)20    Sec. 22.34. Organic waste compost quality standards. 21    (a) The Agency may develop and make recommendations to the 22Board concerning (i) performance standards for organic waste 23compost facilities and (ii) testing procedures and standards 24for the end-product compost produced by organic waste compost 25facilities.  SB2195- 23 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1    The Agency, in cooperation with the Department, shall 2appoint a Technical Advisory Committee for the purpose of 3developing these recommendations. Among other things, the 4Committee shall evaluate environmental and safety 5considerations, compliance costs, and regulations adopted in 6other states and countries. The Committee shall have balanced 7representation and shall include members representing 8academia, the composting industry, the Department of 9Agriculture, the landscaping industry, environmental 10organizations, municipalities, and counties.11    Performance standards for organic waste compost facilities 12may include, but are not limited to: 13        (1) the management of potential exposures for human 14    disease vectors and odor; 15        (2) the management of surface water; 16        (3) contingency planning for handling end-product 17    compost material that does not meet end-product compost 18    standards adopted by the Board; 19        (4) plans for intended purposes of end-use product; 20    and 21        (5) a financial assurance plan necessary to restore 22    the site as specified in Agency permit. The financial 23    assurance plan may include, but is not limited to, posting 24    with the Agency a performance bond or other security for 25    the purpose of ensuring site restoration. 26    (b) No later than one year after the Agency makes   SB2195- 24 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1recommendations to the Board under subsection (a) of this 2Section, the Board shall adopt, as applicable: 3        (1) performance standards for organic waste compost 4    facilities; and 5        (2) testing procedures and standards for the 6    end-product compost produced by organic waste compost 7    facilities.8    The Board shall evaluate the merits of different standards 9for end-product compost applications.10    (c) On-site residential composting that is used solely for 11the purpose of composting organic waste generated on-site and 12that will not be offered for off-site sale or use is exempt 13from any standards promulgated under subsections (a) and (b). 14Subsection (b)(2) shall not apply to end-product compost used 15as daily cover or vegetative amendment in the final layer. 16Subsection (b) applies to any end-product compost offered for 17sale or use in Illinois.18    (d) (Blank). For the purposes of this Section, "organic 19waste" means food scrap, landscape waste, wood waste, 20livestock waste, crop residue, paper waste, or other 21non-hazardous carbonaceous waste that is collected and 22processed separately from the rest of the municipal waste 23stream.24    (e) Except as otherwise provided in Board rules, solid 25waste permits for organic waste composting facilities shall be 26issued under the Board's Solid Waste rules at 35 Ill. Adm. Code   SB2195- 25 -LRB104 10726 BDA 20805 b1807. The permits must include, but shall not be limited to, 2measures designed to reduce pathogens in the compost. 3    (f) Standards adopted under this Section do not apply to 4compost operations exempt from permitting under paragraph 5(1.5) of subsection (q) or under paragraph (1.5) of subsection 6(bb) of Section 21 of this Act. 7(Source: P.A. 98-239, eff. 8-9-13.)